Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1443
Public official, defined.

Public official shall mean an official in the executive branch, an official in the legislative branch, or an elected or appointed official in the judicial branch of the state government or a political subdivision thereof; any elected or appointed member of a school board; and an elected or appointed member of a governing body of a state institution of higher education.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 43.